Utah statutes.
55-5a-5.   Application for permit -- Investigation -- Exception -- Appeal of
denial.
The division shall investigate each application for a permit to assure that
the person, group of persons or organization is actually engaged in the
manufacture or distribution of goods, articles or products made by blind
persons within the meaning of this act. The division may issue permits without
investigation, however, to nonresident persons, groups of persons or
organizations upon proof that they are recognized and approved by the state in
which they reside as authorized to sell such goods, articles or products
pursuant to a law of that state imposing requirements substantially similar to
those prescribed pursuant to this act.
Anyone denied a permit may appeal the decision of the division to the state
superintendent of public instruction or his designated agent.
